Utah statutes.
20A-7-511.   Effective date.

(1) (a)  Any proposed law submitted to the people by initiative petition that is approved by the voters at any election takes effect on the date specified in the initiative petition.

(b)  If the initiative petition does not specify an effective date, a law approved by the voters at any election takes effect five days after the date of the official proclamation of the vote by the county legislative body.

(2)  The local legislative body may amend any laws approved by the people at any meeting after the law has taken effect.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1994 General Session

